District of Columbia statutes.
16-520

Defending against the attachment; trial of issues.

A defendant, any garnishee, party to a forthcoming undertaking, or an officer who might be adjudged liable to the plaintiff by reason of the undertaking being adjudged insufficient, or a stranger to the action who may make claim to the property attached, may file an answer defending against the attachment. The answer may be considered as raising an issue without any reply, and any issue of fact made may be tried with a jury if any party so desires.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-522 and § 16-529.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-520.
1973 Ed., § 16-520.